Georgia statutes. TITLE 46 Public Utilities and Public Transportation
PART 13 Powers and Duties of Foreign Electric Cooperatives Transacting Business in State Generally

46-3-450.
Requirement of obtaining certificate of authority by foreign electric cooperative; applicability of state laws generally; acts not constituting transaction of business in this state.

No foreign electric cooperative shall have the right to transact business in this state until it shall have procured a certificate of authority to do so from the Secretary of State. No foreign electric cooperative shall be entitled to procure a certificate of authority under this article to transact in this state any business which an electric membership corporation organized under the laws of this state is not permitted to transact; and no foreign electric cooperative shall be entitled to procure a certificate of authority to transact any business in this state which under any of the laws of this state a foreign electric cooperative is not permitted to transact. Any foreign electric cooperative to which a certificate of authority is granted shall be subject to all licensing and regulatory statutes of this state relating to businesses of the kind which the foreign electric cooperative proposes to transact in this state. A foreign electric cooperative shall not be denied a certificate of authority by reason of the fact that the laws of the state under which such foreign electric cooperative is organized governing its organization and internal affairs differ from the laws of this state; and nothing contained in this article shall be construed to authorize this state to regulate the organization or the internal affairs of such foreign electric cooperative.

Without excluding other activities which may not constitute transacting business in this state, a foreign electric cooperative shall not be considered to be transacting business in this state, for the purposes of qualification under this article, solely by reason of carrying on in this state any one or more of the following activities:

Maintaining or defending any action or any administrative or arbitration proceeding, or effecting the settlement thereof or the settlement of claims or disputes;

Holding meetings of its directors or members or carrying on other activities concerning its internal affairs;

Maintaining bank accounts, or share accounts in savings and loan associations, custodian or agency arrangements with a bank or trust company, or stock or bond brokerage accounts;

Securing or collecting debts or enforcing any rights in property securing the same;

Effecting transactions in interstate or foreign commerce;

Owning and controlling a subsidiary electric membership corporation or other corporation incorporated in or transacting business within this state; or

Conducting an isolated transaction not in the course of a number of repeated transactions of like nature.

This Code section shall not be deemed to establish a standard for activities which may subject a foreign electric cooperative to taxation or to service of process under any of the laws of this state.

History.

Code 1933, § 34C-1701, enacted by Ga. L. 1981, p. 1587, § 1.

46-3-451.
Powers of foreign electric cooperatives under certificate of authority generally.

A foreign electric cooperative which has received a certificate of authority under this article shall, until a certificate of revocation or of withdrawal has been issued as provided in this article, enjoy the same, but no greater, rights and privileges as an electric membership corporation organized for the purposes set forth in the application pursuant to which such certificate of authority is issued; and, except as otherwise provided in this article, such foreign electric cooperative shall be subject to the same duties, restrictions, penalties, and liabilities imposed upon an electric membership corporation.

History.

Code 1933, § 34C-1702, enacted by Ga. L. 1981, p. 1587, § 1.

46-3-452.
Name of foreign electric cooperative.

No certificate of authority shall be issued to a foreign electric cooperative unless the corporate name shall be written in Roman or cursive letters or Arabic or Roman numbers and:

Shall contain the word “cooperative,” “corporation,” “company,” “incorporated,” or “limited,” or shall contain an abbreviation of one of such words;

Shall not contain any word or phrase which indicates or implies that the foreign electric cooperative is organized for any purpose other than one or more of the purposes permitted by its articles of incorporation;

Shall not be the same as or confusingly similar to:

The name of any electric membership corporation or other corporation, whether for profit or not for profit, existing under the laws of this state;

The name of any foreign electric cooperative or other corporation, whether for profit or not for profit, authorized to transact business in this state;

A name the exclusive right to which is at the time reserved in the manner provided in Chapter 3 of Title 14, the “Georgia Nonprofit Corporation Code,” Chapter 2 of Title 14, the “Georgia Business Corporation Code,” or in this article;

The name of a corporation which has in effect a registration of its corporate name as provided in Chapter 2 of Title 14, the “Georgia Business Corporation Code”; or

Any name prohibited by any other law of this state.

Whenever a foreign electric cooperative is unable to obtain a certificate of authority to transact business in this state because its corporate name does not comply with subparagraphs (a)(3)(A) through (a)(3)(D) of this Code section, it may nonetheless apply for authority to transact business in this state by adding to its corporate name in such application a word, abbreviation, or other distinctive and distinguishing element, such as, for example, the name of the state of its incorporation in parenthesis. If in the judgment of the Secretary of State the corporate name with such addition would comply with subparagraphs (a)(3)(A) through (a)(3)(D) of this Code section, those subparagraphs shall not be a bar to the issuance to such foreign electric cooperative of a certificate of authority to transact business in this state. In such case, any such certificate issued to such foreign electric cooperative shall be issued in its corporate name with such additions; and the foreign electric cooperative shall use such corporate name with such additions in all its dealings with the Secretary of State and in the conduct of its affairs in this state.

Nothing in this Code section shall:

Prevent the use of the name of any electric membership corporation or other corporation, whether domestic or foreign, by a foreign electric cooperative where such electric membership corporation or corporation has consented to such use and the name of the foreign electric cooperative contains other words or characters which distinguish it from the name of the electric membership corporation or other corporation; or

Abrogate or limit the law as to unfair competition or unfair trade practice nor derogate from the common law or principles of equity or the statutes of this state or of the United States with respect to the right to acquire and protect trade names and trademarks.

History.

Code 1933, § 34C-1703, enacted by Ga. L. 1981, p. 1587, § 1.

46-3-453.
Change of name by foreign electric cooperative.

Whenever a foreign electric cooperative which is authorized to transact business in this state changes its name, such foreign electric cooperative shall, within 30 days after such change becomes effective, file an application for an amended certificate of authority in accordance with Code Section 46-3-462. If the foreign electric cooperative fails to file this application or if the name to which it has changed would be unavailable to the foreign electric cooperative on an original application for a certificate of authority, the certificate of authority of such foreign electric cooperative shall be suspended and it shall not thereafter transact any business in this state until it has filed the application or has changed its name to a name which is available to it under the laws of this state.

History.

Code 1933, § 34C-1704, enacted by Ga. L. 1981, p. 1587, § 1.

46-3-454.
Contents of application for certificate of authority; submission of consent to appointment as registered agent; execution of application by officers of foreign electric cooperative.

A foreign electric cooperative, in order to procure a certificate of authority to transact business in this state, shall make application therefor to the Secretary of State, which application shall set forth:

The name of the foreign electric cooperative and the jurisdiction under the laws of which it is incorporated;

If the name of the foreign electric cooperative does not comply with Code Section 46-3-452 relating to the corporate name, the name of the foreign electric cooperative with the word or abbreviation or other distinctive and distinguishing element which it elects to add thereto for use in this state;

The date of incorporation and the period of duration of the foreign electric cooperative;

The address of the principal office or registered office of the foreign electric cooperative in the jurisdiction under the laws of which it is incorporated;

The address of the proposed registered office of the foreign electric cooperative in this state and the name of its proposed registered agent in this state at such address;

A brief statement of the purpose or purposes which the foreign electric cooperative proposes to pursue in the transaction of business in this state;

The names and respective addresses of the four principal officers of the foreign electric cooperative;

A statement of the number of members of the foreign electric cooperative; and

Such additional information as may be necessary or appropriate in order to enable the Secretary of State to determine whether such foreign electric cooperative is entitled to a certificate of authority to transact business in this state.

The application shall be accompanied by a consent to appointment as registered agent, as provided for in subsection (c) of Code Section 46-3-457.

Such application shall be made on forms prescribed and furnished by the Secretary of State and shall be executed by the foreign electric cooperative by its president or a vice-president or by its secretary or an assistant secretary.

History.

Code 1933, § 34C-1705, enacted by Ga. L. 1981, p. 1587, § 1.

46-3-455.
Filing of application for certificate of authority; issuance of certificate of authority by Secretary of State.

The application of the foreign electric cooperative for a certificate of authority shall be delivered to the Secretary of State for filing as provided in Code Section 46-3-174, together with a copy of its articles of incorporation and all amendments thereto, or, in lieu thereof, if provided by its jurisdiction of incorporation, a copy of its latest restated, composite, or consolidated articles of incorporation and all amendments subsequent thereto, either of which copy shall have been duly authenticated by the proper officer of its jurisdiction of incorporation within 90 days of the date the application is filed under this subsection.

Upon filing the application, the Secretary of State shall issue and deliver to the foreign electric cooperative or its representative a certificate of authority to transact business in this state.

History.

Code 1933, § 34C-1706, enacted by Ga. L. 1981, p. 1587, § 1.

46-3-456.
Effect of certificate of authority.

Upon the issuance of a certificate of authority by the Secretary of State, the foreign electric cooperative shall be authorized to transact business in this state for those purposes set forth in its application. Such authority shall continue so long as the foreign electric cooperative retains its authority to do such business in its jurisdiction of incorporation and so long as its authority to do business in this state has not been suspended, revoked, or surrendered as provided in this article.

History.

Code 1933, § 34C-1707, enacted by Ga. L. 1981, p. 1587, § 1.

46-3-457.
Designation of registered office and registered agent of foreign electric cooperative; maintenance by Secretary of State of offices and agents; consent to appointment as agent.

Each foreign electric cooperative authorized to transact business in this state shall have and continuously maintain in this state:

A registered office which may be, but need not be, the same as its place of business in this state; and

A registered agent, which agent may be a natural person resident in this state whose business office is identical with such registered office, a domestic corporation, or a foreign corporation authorized to transact business in this state, such domestic or foreign corporation having a business office identical with such registered office.

The Secretary of State shall maintain current records, alphabetically arranged by corporate name, of the address of each foreign electric cooperative’s registered office and of the name and address of each foreign electric cooperative’s registered agent.

No registered agent shall be appointed without his or its prior written consent. Such written consent shall be filed with or as part of the document first appointing any registered agent and shall be in such form as the Secretary of State may prescribe.

History.

Code 1933, § 34C-1708, enacted by Ga. L. 1981, p. 1587, § 1.

46-3-458.
Change of registered office or registered agent of foreign electric cooperative.

A foreign electric cooperative authorized to transact business in this state may change its registered office or change its registered agent, or both, upon filing in the office of the Secretary of State a statement setting forth:

The name of the foreign electric cooperative;

The address of its then registered office;

If the address of its registered office is to be changed, the new address of the registered office;

The name of its then registered agent;

If its registered agent is to be changed, the name of its successor registered agent and the written consent of such successor agent to his or its appointment; and

That the address of its registered office and the address of the business office of its registered agent, as changed, will be identical.

Such statement shall be executed by an officer of the foreign electric cooperative and delivered to the Secretary of State. If the Secretary of State finds that such statement conforms to this article, he shall file such statement in his office; and upon such filing, the change of address of the registered office or the change of the registered agent, or both, as the case may be, shall become effective.

A registered agent of a foreign electric cooperative may resign as such agent upon filing a written notice thereof with the Secretary of State. The appointment of such agent shall terminate 30 days after receipt of such notice by the Secretary of State. There shall be attached to such notice an affidavit of such agent, if an individual, or, if a corporation, of an officer thereof, that at least ten days prior to the date of filing such notice a written notice of the agent’s intention to resign was mailed or delivered to the president, secretary, or treasurer of the foreign electric cooperative for which such agent is acting. Upon such resignation’s becoming effective, the address of the business office of the resigned registered agent shall no longer be the address of the registered office of the foreign electric cooperative.

A registered agent may change his business address and the address of the registered office of any foreign electric cooperative of which he is a registered agent to another place within the same county by filing a statement as required in subsection (a) of this Code section, except that such statement need be signed only by the registered agent and need not be responsive to paragraph (5) of subsection (a) of this Code section and must recite that a copy of the statement has been mailed or delivered to a representative of such foreign electric cooperative other than the notifying registered agent.

History.

Code 1933, § 34C-1709, enacted by Ga. L. 1981, p. 1587, § 1.

46-3-459.
Service of process on foreign electric cooperative authorized to transact business in this state.

The registered agent appointed pursuant to Code Section 46-3-458 by a foreign electric cooperative authorized to transact business in this state shall be an agent of such foreign electric cooperative upon whom any process, notice, or demand required or permitted by law to be served upon the foreign electric cooperative may be served in the manner provided by law for the service of a summons and complaint.

Whenever a foreign electric cooperative doing business or having done business in this state shall fail to appoint or maintain a registered agent in this state, or whenever any such registered agent cannot with reasonable diligence be found at the registered office, or whenever the certificate of authority of a foreign electric cooperative shall be suspended or revoked, then the Secretary of State shall be an agent of such foreign electric cooperative upon whom any such process, notice, or demand may be served. Service on the Secretary of State of any such process, notice, or demand shall be made by delivering to and leaving with him, or with any person having charge of the corporation’s division of his office, or with any other person or persons designated by the Secretary of State to receive such service, duplicate copies of such process, notice, or demand. In the event any such process, notice, or demand is served on the Secretary of State, he shall immediately cause one of such copies thereof to be forwarded by registered or certified mail or statutory overnight delivery, addressed to the foreign electric cooperative at its principal office in the jurisdiction under the laws of which it is incorporated. Any service so had on the Secretary of State shall be answerable not more than 30 days from the date so mailed by the Secretary of State.

The Secretary of State shall keep a record of all processes, notices, and demands served upon him under this Code section and shall record therein the time of such service and his action with reference thereto.

Nothing contained in this Code section shall limit or affect the right to serve any process, notice, or demand required or permitted by law to be served upon a foreign electric cooperative in any other manner permitted by law.

History.

Code 1933, § 34C-1710, enacted by Ga. L. 1981, p. 1587, § 1; Ga. L. 2000, p. 1589, § 3.

Editor’s notes.

Ga. L. 2000, p. 1589, § 16, not codified by the General Assembly, provides that the amendment to subsection (b) is applicable with respect to notices delivered on or after July 1, 2000.

46-3-460.
Filing of amendment to articles of incorporation of foreign electric cooperative.

Whenever the articles of incorporation of a foreign electric cooperative authorized to transact business in this state are amended, such foreign electric cooperative shall, within 30 days after such amendment becomes effective, file in the office of the Secretary of State a copy of such amendment or, in lieu thereof, if provided for by its jurisdiction of incorporation, a copy of its restated, composite, or consolidated articles of incorporation reflecting such amendment, duly certified by the proper officer of its jurisdiction of incorporation; but the filing thereof shall not of itself enlarge or alter the purpose or purposes which such foreign electric cooperative is authorized to pursue in the transaction of business in this state, nor authorize such foreign electric cooperative to transact business in this state under any other name than the name set forth in its certificate of authority.

History.

Code 1933, § 34C-1711, enacted by Ga. L. 1981, p. 1587, § 1.

46-3-461.
Effect of merger whereby foreign electric cooperative is surviving entity.

Whenever a foreign electric cooperative authorized to transact business in this state is a party to a statutory merger permitted by the laws of its jurisdiction of incorporation and such foreign electric cooperative is the surviving entity, it shall, within 30 days after such merger becomes effective, file with the Secretary of State a copy of the articles or agreement of merger duly certified by the proper officer of the jurisdiction under the laws of which such statutory merger was effected; and it shall not be necessary for such foreign electric cooperative to procure either a new or amended certificate of authority to transact business in this state unless the name of such foreign electric cooperative is changed thereby or unless the foreign electric cooperative desires to pursue in this state other or additional purposes than those which it is then authorized to transact in this state.

History.

Code 1933, § 34C-1712, enacted by Ga. L. 1981, p. 1587, § 1.

46-3-462.
Amending of certificate of authority.

A foreign electric cooperative authorized to transact business in this state shall make application to the Secretary of State for an amended certificate of authority within 30 days after it:

Changes its corporate name; or

Enlarges, limits, or otherwise changes the purpose or purposes which it proposes to pursue in the transaction of business in this state.

Such application shall be made on forms prescribed by the Secretary of State and shall be executed and filed in the same manner as an original application for a certificate of authority and shall set forth:

The name of the foreign electric cooperative as it appears in its original application for a certificate of authority and the jurisdiction under the laws of which it is incorporated;

The proposed amendment to its certificate of authority;

If the amendment includes a change of name, a statement that the change of name has been effected under the laws of its jurisdiction of incorporation; and

If the amendment enlarges, limits, or otherwise changes the business or businesses which it proposes to do in this state, a statement that it is authorized to do such business in its jurisdiction of incorporation.

The issuance of an amended certificate of authority shall be governed by the same provisions, and the effect of its issuance shall be the same, as in the case of an original application for a certificate of authority.

History.

Code 1933, § 34C-1713, enacted by Ga. L. 1981, p. 1587, § 1.

46-3-463.
Contents of application for withdrawal; execution of application and attestation by officers; obtaining of certificate from state revenue commissioner.

A foreign electric cooperative authorized to transact business in this state may withdraw from this state upon procuring from the Secretary of State a certificate of withdrawal. In order to procure such certificate of withdrawal, the foreign electric cooperative shall deliver to the Secretary of State an application for withdrawal, which shall set forth:

The name of the foreign electric cooperative and the jurisdiction under the laws of which it is incorporated;

That the foreign electric cooperative is not transacting business in this state;

That the foreign electric cooperative surrenders its authority to transact business in this state;

That the foreign electric cooperative revokes the authority of its registered agent in this state to accept service of process and consents that service of process in any action or proceeding based upon any cause of action that accrued in this state during the time the foreign electric cooperative was authorized to transact business in this state thereafter may be made on such foreign electric cooperative by service thereof on the Secretary of State; and

A post office address to which the Secretary of State may mail a copy of any process against the foreign electric cooperative that may be served on him.

The application for withdrawal shall be made on forms prescribed and furnished by the Secretary of State and shall be executed on behalf of the foreign electric cooperative by its president or a vice-president and attested by its secretary or an assistant secretary. If the foreign electric cooperative is in the hands of a receiver or trustee, the application shall be executed on behalf of the foreign electric cooperative by such receiver or trustee.

Before the Secretary of State shall issue a certificate of withdrawal, the foreign electric cooperative shall secure from the state revenue commissioner a certificate that the foreign electric cooperative has met the requirements concerning reports and taxes.

History.

Code 1933, § 34C-1714, enacted by Ga. L. 1981, p. 1587, § 1.

46-3-464.
Filing of application for withdrawal; issuance of certificate of withdrawal; time of cessation of authority to transact business.

The application for withdrawal shall be delivered to the Secretary of State for filing as provided in Code Section 46-3-174. Upon filing the application, the Secretary of State shall issue and deliver to the foreign electric cooperative or its representative a certificate of withdrawal.

Upon the issuance of such certificate of withdrawal, the authority of the foreign electric cooperative to transact business in this state shall cease.

History.

Code 1933, § 34C-1715, enacted by Ga. L. 1981, p. 1587, § 1.

46-3-465.
Effect of termination of existence of foreign electric cooperative.

When a foreign electric cooperative authorized to transact business in this state is dissolved or its authority or existence is otherwise terminated or canceled in its jurisdiction of incorporation, or when such foreign electric cooperative is merged into or consolidated with another foreign electric cooperative, the foreign electric cooperative or its successor, receiver, or trustee shall deliver for filing with the Secretary of State a certificate of the appropriate official of its jurisdiction of incorporation attesting to the occurrence of any such event or an order or decree of a court of such jurisdiction directing the dissolution of such foreign electric cooperative, the termination of its existence, or the cancellation of its authority, together with a statement of the post office address to which the Secretary of State may mail a copy of any process against the foreign electric cooperative that may be served on him.

The filing of such certificate or judgment shall be done in the same manner and shall have the same effect as the filing of an application for withdrawal; and the Secretary of State shall issue a certificate of withdrawal thereon which shall be returned to the foreign electric cooperative or its representative. Upon the issuance of such certificate of withdrawal, the authority of the foreign electric cooperative to transact business in this state shall cease.

Upon the issuance of such certificate of withdrawal, the Secretary of State shall be the agent of the foreign electric cooperative upon whom any process, notice, or demand may be served in any action or proceeding based upon any cause of action accruing in this state prior to the issuance of such certificate. Such service and the action thereon shall be the same as provided in this article in other cases where the Secretary of State is agent for service.

Before the Secretary of State shall issue a certificate of withdrawal, the foreign electric cooperative shall secure from the state revenue commissioner a certificate that the foreign electric cooperative has met the requirements concerning reports and taxes.

History.

Code 1933, § 34C-1716, enacted by Ga. L. 1981, p. 1587, § 1.

46-3-466.
Grounds for revocation of certificate of authority; giving notice of revocation.

The certificate of authority of a foreign electric cooperative to transact business in this state may be revoked by the Secretary of State upon the conditions prescribed in this Code section when:

The foreign electric cooperative has failed to file its annual report to the Secretary of State within the time required by Code Section 46-3-481, or has failed to pay any fees or penalties prescribed by this article when they have become due and payable, or has failed to file its annual license or occupation tax return on or before the day such return becomes due;

The foreign electric cooperative has failed to appoint and maintain a registered agent in this state as required by Code Section 46-3-457;

The foreign electric cooperative has failed, after change of its registered office or registered agent, to file in the office of the Secretary of State a statement of such change as required by Code Section 46-3-458;

The foreign electric cooperative has failed to file in the office of the Secretary of State any articles of merger within the time prescribed by Code Section 46-3-461;

The foreign electric cooperative has failed to make application to the Secretary of State for an amended certificate of authority under the circumstances and within the time prescribed by Code Section 46-3-462; or

A misrepresentation has been made of any material matter in any application, report, affidavit, or other document submitted by such foreign electric cooperative pursuant to this article.

No certificate of authority of a foreign electric cooperative shall be revoked by the Secretary of State unless:

He shall have given the foreign electric cooperative not less than 60 days’ notice thereof by mail addressed to its registered office in this state; and

The foreign electric cooperative shall fail prior to revocation to file such annual report, or pay such fees or penalties, or file its annual license or occupation tax return, or file the required statement of change of registered agent or registered office, or file such articles of amendment or articles of merger or make application for such amended certificate of authority, or correct such misrepresentation.

History.

Code 1933, § 34C-1717, enacted by Ga. L. 1981, p. 1587, § 1.

46-3-467.
Issuance of certificate of revocation; time of cessation of authority to transact business.

Upon revoking any such certificate of authority, the Secretary of State shall:

Issue a certificate of revocation in duplicate;

File one of such certificates in his office; and

Mail to such foreign electric cooperative at its registered office in this state or, if the foreign electric cooperative has no such registered office, at its last known address either within or without this state as shown by the records of the Secretary of State, a notice of such revocation accompanied by one of such certificates.

Upon issuance of such certificate of revocation, the authority of the foreign electric cooperative to transact business in this state shall cease.

History.

Code 1933, § 34C-1719, enacted by Ga. L. 1981, p. 1587, § 1.

46-3-468.
Application for reinstatement of certificate of authority.

A foreign electric cooperative whose certificate of authority has been revoked by the Secretary of State under the conditions prescribed by Code Section 46-3-466 shall be reinstated by the Secretary of State by the issuance of a certificate of reinstatement. The certificate of reinstatement may be issued at any time within five years from the date of the certificate of revocation upon approval of an application for reinstatement executed by the foreign electric cooperative as provided in Code Section 46-3-173 and filed with the Secretary of State as provided in Code Section 46-3-174. The Secretary of State shall issue the certificate of reinstatement whenever it is established to the satisfaction of the Secretary of State that in fact there was no cause for revocation or whenever the omission or delinquency resulting in revocation has been corrected and payment made of all fees, taxes, and penalties which accrued before revocation.

The application for reinstatement shall be accompanied by an amount equal to the total of all fees, taxes, and penalties which would have been payable for the years or parts thereof during the period between revocation and reinstatement and a reinstatement filing fee of $25.00. Reinstatement shall not be authorized if the name of the foreign electric cooperative is not available in accordance with Code Section 46-3-452 unless the application for reinstatement includes an adoption of a corporate name that is available. In the event an application for reinstatement adopts a new corporate name for the foreign electric cooperative as provided in Code Section 46-3-453, the original certificate of authority shall be deemed to have been amended to change the name of the foreign electric cooperative to the name so adopted. In the event that a foreign electric cooperative amends its articles of incorporation or is a party to a merger during the period between revocation and reinstatement, it shall accompany its application for reinstatement with a duly executed copy of such amendment, or of the articles or agreement of merger, pursuant to Code Sections 46-3-460 and 46-3-461. Upon the issuance of the certificate of reinstatement, the foreign electric cooperative’s authorization to transact business in this state, pursuant to its original application to transact business, shall be deemed to have continued from the date of the certificate of revocation.

The application for reinstatement shall be in substantially the following form:

Click to view

Application for Reinstatement of Certificate of Authority To:
The Secretary of State
Atlanta, Georgia Pursuant to the provisions of , the undersigned foreign electric cooperative hereby applies for a certificate of reinstatement of a foreign electric cooperative and, for that purpose, submits the following: Code Section 46-3-468 First: The name of the foreign electric cooperative at the date of the certificate of revocation was . Second: The new name by which the foreign electric cooperative will hereafter be known is . Third: The certificate of authority to transact business in the State of Georgia was revoked on for failure to follow the requirements stated in . Code Section 46-3-466 Fourth: The address, including street and number, of its registered office in Georgia is ; and the name of its registered agent in Georgia at that address is . Fifth: The application is accompanied by all delinquent reports together with the filing fees and penalties required by Article 4 of Chapter 3 of Title 46, the “Georgia Electric Membership Corporation Act.” Date , . (President or vice-president) (Secretary or assistant secretary)

History.

Code 1933, § 34C-1718, enacted by Ga. L. 1981, p. 1587, § 1; Ga. L. 1999, p. 81, § 46.

46-3-469.
Transacting business without certificate of authority.

A foreign electric cooperative that is required under this article to obtain a certificate of authority but fails to do so shall be liable to this state for the years or parts thereof during which it transacted business in this state without a certificate of authority, in an amount equal to all fees which would have been imposed by this article upon such foreign electric cooperative had it duly applied for and received a certificate of authority to transact business in this state as required by this article and thereafter filed all reports required by this article, plus all penalties imposed by this article. The Attorney General, at the direction of the Secretary of State, shall bring proceedings in the name of the state to recover all amounts due this state under this Code section.

No foreign electric cooperative that is required under this article to obtain a certificate of authority shall be permitted to maintain any action or proceeding in any court of this state unless before commencement of the action it shall have obtained such a certificate. No action or proceeding may be maintained in any court of this state by any foreign electric cooperative that is the successor or assignee of such foreign electric cooperative on any right, claim, or demand arising out of the transaction of business by such foreign electric cooperative in this state unless before commencement of the action a certificate of authority shall have been obtained by such foreign electric cooperative or by a foreign electric cooperative which has acquired all or substantially all of its assets.

The failure of a foreign electric cooperative to obtain a certificate of authority to transact business in this state shall render voidable any contract of such foreign electric cooperative arising out of business transacted in this state at the instance of any other party to such contract; but such voidability may be cured by the foreign electric cooperative’s obtaining a certificate of authority, provided that such certificate of authority is obtained prior to final judgment in any action wherein this subsection is relied upon. The failure of such foreign electric cooperative to obtain a certificate of authority shall not prevent such foreign electric cooperative from defending any action or proceeding in any court of this state, nor shall any party avail himself of the benefit of subsection (b) of this Code section except upon motion prior to judgment.

History.

Code 1933, § 34C-1720, enacted by Ga. L. 1981, p. 1587, § 1.